Florida, session 2026, SB52.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSubsection (16) is added to section 493.6102, 14 Florida Statutes, to read: 15 493.6102âInapplicability of this chapter.âThis chapter 16 shall not apply to: 17 (16)âAny person who, on a voluntary basis and without 18 compensation, provides armed security services on the premises 19 of a church, mosque, synagogue, or other place of worship. 20 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 21 made by this act to section 493.6102, Florida Statutes, in a 22 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 493.6201, Florida 23 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 24 493.6201âClasses of licenses.â 25 (4)âClass âCâ or Class âCCâ licensees shall own or be an 26 employee of a Class âAâ agency, a Class âAâ and Class âBâ 27 agency, or a branch office. This does not include those who are 28 exempt under s. 493.6102, but who possess a Class âCâ license 29 solely for the purpose of holding a Class âGâ license. 30 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.